Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1444.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 11, chapter 7, article 8, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 11-1052, to read: START_STATUTE11-1052. Deportation task force; enforcement; definition A. An association of sheriffs shall establish, staff and administer the deportation task force.  The deportation task force shall Authorize a law enforcement agency to coordinate with THE UNITED STATES IMMIGRATION AND CUSTOMS ENFORCEMENT for the deportation of a person who has entered or remained in the United States illegally and who has done any of the following: 1. Been convicted of committing a criminal offense. 2. Been alleged to have committed a criminal offense. 3. Been detained by a law enforcement agency based on the suspicion that the person has committed a criminal offense. 4. Been detained by a law enforcement agency in connection with the commission of a criminal offense. B. For the purpose of this section, "Law enforcement agency" means: 1. The police department of any municipality. 2. A county sheriff's office. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Appropriation; deportation task force; exemption A. The sum of $__________________ is appropriated from the general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the deportation task force for establishing and administering the deportation task force established pursuant to section 11-1052, Arizona Revised Statutes, as added by this act. B. The appropriation made in subsection A of this section is exempt from the provisions of section 35-190, Arizona Revised Statutes, relating to lapsing of appropriations.